Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202584-612
Cash Reserve Fund; created; transfers; limitations; receipt of federal funds.

(1) There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund known as the Cash Reserve Fund which shall be under the direction of the State Treasurer. The fund shall only be used pursuant to this section.

(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer funds from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund upon certification by the Director of Administrative Services that the current cash balance in the General Fund is inadequate to meet current obligations. Such certification shall include the dollar amount to be transferred. Any transfers made pursuant to this subsection shall be reversed upon notification by the Director of Administrative Services that sufficient funds are available.

(3) In addition to receiving transfers from other funds, the Cash Reserve Fund shall receive federal funds received by the State of Nebraska for undesignated general government purposes, federal revenue sharing, or general fiscal relief of the state.

(4) No funds shall be transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund to fulfill the obligations created under the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act unless the balance in the Cash Reserve Fund after such transfer will be at least equal to five hundred million dollars.

(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the School Safety and Security Fund as soon as administratively possible after September 2, 2023, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Revolving Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(7) The State Treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(8) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-nine million four hundred fifty-eight thousand eight hundred dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(9) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million five hundred thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but on or before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(10) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the State Insurance Fund as soon as possible after April 2, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(11) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-five million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(12) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(13) The State Treasurer shall transfer forty-five million eight hundred ninety-seven thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(14) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Self-Insured Liability Fund on or before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(15) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer two hundred million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Transformational Project Fund in increments necessary to fund the distributions authorized in section 81-12,193, beginning in fiscal year 2027-28 and continuing each fiscal year until such distribution requirements are met.

(16) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred forty-seven million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(17) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

Laws 1983, LB 59, § 5;

Laws 1985, LB 713, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 501, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 739, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 870, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 131, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 1091, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 310, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 857, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 783, § 33;

Laws 1992, LB 1268, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 38, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1045, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1290, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 401, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 63, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 988, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 30;

Laws 1998, LB 1134, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 1219, § 23;

Laws 1999, LB 881, § 9;

Laws 2000, LB 1214, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 541, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 1310, § 20;

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 74;

Laws 2003, LB 798, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 1090, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 427, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1131, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1256, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB323, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB846, § 21;

Laws 2008, LB1094, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB1116, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB1165, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB456, § 3;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB2, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB317, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB379, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB131, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB200, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB130, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB1016, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB662, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB957, § 13;

Laws 2016, LB960, § 31;

Laws 2017, LB332, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB946, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB299, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 141;

Laws 2020, LB1198, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB385, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB509, § 22;

Laws 2022, LB977, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB1013, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB1024, § 16;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 52;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 108;

Laws 2023, LB818, § 34;

Laws 2024, LB600, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB1413, § 58;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 45;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 205;

Laws 2025, LB265, § 19.

Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, see section 77-6701.